src/fst/phonology.twolc
!! =================================== !
!! The Lithuanian morphophonological/twolc rules file !
!! =================================== !

Alphabet
 a ą b c č d e ę ė f g h i į y j k l m n o p r s š t u ų ū v z ž

 A Ą B C Č D E Ę Ė F G H I Į y J K L M N O P R S Š T U Ų Ū V Z Ž

 %>:0 ;

Sets

 Vow = a ą e ę ė i į y o u ų ū ;
 Cns = b c č d f g h j k l m n p r s š t v z ž ;
 
 ! Non-palatal vowels
 NonPalV = a ą o u ų ū 
         A Ą O U Ų Ū ;

! Palatal vowels
PalV = e ę ė i į y 
     E Ę Ė I Į Y ;

Rules

"Deleting stem-final s in s genitive"
 s:0 <=> Vow s %>: _ ;

!!€ primus%>s
!!€ primus00

!!€grís%>s
!!€grís00

!!$grís%>s
!!$grís0s

"Deleting double s"
s:0 <=> s_ ;

"Deleting s after š"
s:0 <=> š_ ;

"t becomes č preceding i and a, o, u"
t:č <=> _i NonPalV ;

"d becomes dž preceding i and a, o, u"
d:dž <=> _i NonPalV ;
